District of Columbia statutes.
16-4011

Governmental entity as party.

(a)

The disqualification of § 16-4009(a) applies to a collaborative lawyer representing a party that is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

(b)

After a collaborative law process concludes, another lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may represent a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative matter if:

(1)

The collaborative law participation agreement so provides; and

(2)

The collaborative lawyer is isolated from any participation in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative matter through procedures within the law firm that are reasonably calculated to isolate the collaborative lawyer from such-participation.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
This section is referenced in § 16-4009, § 16-4014, and § 16-4020.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 11 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.